Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 2 Board and Department of Corrections

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1 changed the name of the Department of Offender Rehabilitation, the Board of Offender Rehabilitation, and the commissioner of offender rehabilitation to the Department of Corrections, the Board of Corrections, and the commissioner of corrections, respectively, and amended sections throughout the Code to conform to the change. Section 2 of that Act, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: “For administrative convenience, equipment and supplies bearing the name Board of Offender Rehabilitation, Department of Offender Rehabilitation, or commissioner of offender rehabilitation may be used by the Board of Corrections, Department of Corrections, or commissioner of corrections as if such equipment or supplies bore the name Board of Corrections, Department of Corrections, or commissioner of corrections.”

Law reviews.

For comment, “Inherently Governmental:
A Legal Argument for Ending Private Federal Prisons and Detention Centers,” see 67 Emory L.J. 293 (2017).

42-2-1.
Creation.

There is created the Department of Corrections.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-3/HB 1176.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “As used in this chapter, the term:

“(1) ‘Board’ means the Board of Corrections.

“(2) ‘Commissioner’ means the commissioner of corrections.

“(3) ‘Department’ means the Department of Corrections.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia’s Administrative Law,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

42-2-2.
Board members, officers, records, and compensation.

On and after July 1, 1983, the board shall consist of one member from each congressional district in the state and five additional members from the state at large. All members shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The initial terms of members shall be as follows: two members representative of congressional districts and one at-large member shall be appointed for a term ending July 1, 1984; two members representative of congressional districts and one at-large member shall be appointed for a term ending July 1, 1985; two members representative of congressional districts and one at-large member shall be appointed for a term ending July 1, 1986; two members representative of congressional districts and one at-large member shall be appointed for a term ending July 1, 1987; and two members representative of congressional districts and one at-large member shall be appointed for a term ending July 1, 1988. Thereafter, all members appointed to the board by the Governor shall be appointed for terms of five years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy during the term of any member by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, the appointment of a successor by the Governor shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of such member.

The first members appointed under this Code section shall be appointed for terms which begin July 1, 1983. The members of the board serving on April 1, 1983, shall remain in office until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The board shall annually elect one of its members as chairman and shall elect from its membership a secretary of the board. The secretary of the board shall keep adequate records and minutes of all business and official acts of the board. Records of the board shall be maintained in the office of the commissioner.

Each member of the Board of Corrections shall receive the sum provided for by Code Section 45-7-21 for each day of actual attendance at meetings of the board and for each day of travel as a member of a committee of the board. In addition, upon recommendation by the chairman or the board, each member shall receive for out-of-state travel actual expenses incurred in connection therewith and reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile in connection with such attendance. Such sums, expenses, and costs shall be paid from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the Department of Corrections.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 507, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1986, p. 179, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 507, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-2-3.
Board meetings.

The board shall meet once each month in the office of the commissioner, unless in the discretion of a majority of the board it is necessary or convenient to meet elsewhere to carry out the duties of the board. Special meetings may be held at such times and places as shall be specified by the call of the chairman of the board or by the commissioner. The secretary of the board shall give written notice of the time and place of all meetings of the board to each member of the board and to the commissioner. Meetings of the board shall be open to the public. However, the board may hold executive sessions pursuant to Chapter 14 of Title 50 whenever it, in its discretion, deems advisable. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 7; Ga. L. 1987, p. 457, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1426, § 1.

42-2-4.
Department created.

There is created the Department of Corrections.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

42-2-5.
Administrative functions of department.

The department shall administer the state’s correctional institutions and the rehabilitative programs conducted therein.

The department shall provide The Council of Superior Court Clerks of Georgia the data set forth in Code Section 15-12-40.1, without charge and in the electronic format requested.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 15; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1647, § 4; Ga. L. 2014, p. 451, § 13/HB 776.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Board of Corrections, Administration, Chapter 125-1-1.

42-2-5.1.
Special school district for school age youth.

In order to provide education for any school age youth incarcerated within any facility of the department, the department shall be considered a special school district which shall be given the same funding consideration for federal funds that school districts within this state are given. The special school district under the department shall have the powers, privileges, and authority exercised or capable of exercise by any other school district. The schools within the special school district shall be under the control of the commissioner, who shall serve as the superintendent of schools for such district, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. The board shall serve as the board of education for such district. The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the State Board of Education, shall establish education standards for the district. As far as is practicable, such standards shall adhere to the standards adopted by the State Board of Education for the education of school age youth, while taking into account:

The overriding security needs of correctional institutions and other restrictions inherent to the nature of correctional facilities;

The effect of limited funding on the capability of the department to meet certain school standards; and

Existing juvenile education standards of the Correctional Education Association and the American Correctional Association, which shall be given primary consideration where any conflicts arise.

Any school within the department that is operated by a state charter school pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with Code Section 20-2-2084.1 shall be under the control of the State Charter Schools Commission and the governing board of the state charter school, subject to any conditions in the contract. Any such school shall not be considered a part of the special school district established pursuant to this Code section.

The effect of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be to provide state funds to the special school district under the department through Part 4 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 20-2-2084.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 357, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49; Ga. L. 2014, p. 34, § 1-6/SB 365; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 2-5/SB 367.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “department” for “Department of Corrections” in the first sentence of subsection (a) and in paragraph (a)(2); substituted “board” for “Board of Corrections” in the fourth sentence of subsection (a); and redesignated former subsection (c) as present subsection (a) of Code Section 42-2-5.2.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (a), substituted “youth” for “youths” near the beginning and substituted “this” for “the” near the end, and, in the second sentence, added “, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section”; added present subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c); and added “, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 20-2-2084.1” at the end.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 25 (2014)

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-2-5.2.
Educational programs for adult offenders; awarding of Program and Treatment Completion Certificate.

The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia or other relevant education agencies, shall provide overall direction of educational programs for adult offenders in the correctional system and shall exercise program approval authority. The board may enter into written agreements with other educational organizations and agencies in order to provide adult offenders with such education and employment skills most likely to encourage gainful employment and discourage return to criminal activity upon release. The board may also enter into agreements with other educational organizations and agencies to attain program certification for its vocational and technical education programs.

The board shall develop and implement programs to assist adult offenders with reentry into society upon release from prison. In addition to educational and vocational programs, reentry programs may include social and behavioral programs, substance abuse counseling, mentoring programs, financial planning, physical and mental health programs, and housing and federal assistance programs.

The board shall create a Program and Treatment Completion Certificate that may be issued to offenders under the rules and regulations of the board. Such certificate shall symbolize an offender’s achievements toward successful reentry into society. The board’s rules and regulations relating to the issuance of such certificate shall take into account an offender’s disciplinary record and any other factor the board deems relevant to an individual’s qualification for such certificate. The board’s rules and regulations shall specify eligibility considerations and requirements for completion of such certificate. An offender who was convicted of a serious violent felony, as such term is defined in Code Section 17-10-6.1, shall not be eligible for such certificate.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state, and no action shall be maintained against the state or any agency or department thereof for issuance of or failure to issue any Program and Treatment Completion Certificate.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 34, § 1-6/SB 365.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references.

Presumptions in issuance of Program and Treatment Completion Certificate, § 51-1-54.

42-2-6.
Office of commissioner created; general duties; appointment; compensation.

There is created the position of commissioner of corrections. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department. Subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department by this title.

The commissioner shall be appointed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. Beginning July 1, 1999, the salary of the commissioner shall be set by the Governor and the expenses and allowances of the commissioner shall be as set by statute.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1647, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 910, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1213, § 3.

42-2-7.
Duties of commissioner relating to department retirements.

The commissioner shall act for the department for and in compliance to any retirement provisions for the employees and officials of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 124, § 1.

42-2-8.
Additional duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall direct and supervise all the administrative activities of the board and shall attend all meetings of the board. The commissioner shall also make, publish in print or electronically, and furnish to the General Assembly and to the Governor annual reports regarding the work of the board, along with such special reports as he or she may consider helpful in the administration of the penal system or as may be directed by the board. The commissioner shall perform such other duties and functions as are necessary or desirable to carry out the intent of this chapter and which he or she may be directed to perform by the board.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall be authorized to make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the acquisition of professional and personal employment services and for the leasing of real property. Subject to legislative appropriations, the commissioner shall also be authorized to make and execute any contract for the land acquisition, design, construction, operation, maintenance, use, lease, or management of a state correctional institution or for any services pertaining to the custody, care, and control of inmates or other functions as are related to the discharge of these responsibilities and to designate any person or organization with whom the commissioner contracts as a law enforcement unit under paragraph (7) of Code Section 35-8-2.

The commissioner and any person designated and serving in the position of his or her chief of staff shall be authorized to issue a warrant for the arrest of an offender who has escaped from the custody of the department upon probable cause to believe the offender has violated Code Section 16-10-52, relating to escape from lawful confinement.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 9; Ga. L. 1958, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 689, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 121, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1448, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 691, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 1/HB 313; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2016, p. 608, § 3/SB 270; Ga. L. 2016, p. 811, § 7/HB 874.

The 2016 amendments.

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “and any person designated and serving in the position of his or her chief of staff” near the beginning of subsection (c). See Editor’s notes for applicability. The second 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, made identical changes. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 608, § 6/SB 270, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “Section 3 of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to offenses committed on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 811, § 9/HB 874, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “Section 7 of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to offenses committed on or after such date.”

42-2-9.
Selection of department personnel; establishment and maintenance of roster of employees.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint and employ such clerical force as is necessary to carry on the administration of the penal system. He may also employ such experts and technical help as are needed, along with assistants to the commissioner, wardens, superintendents, guards, and other employees necessary for the operation of the state operated institutions where inmates are confined. The commissioner shall establish and maintain in his office a complete roster of all employees in his office and in each of the various institutions operating under the authority of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 10; Ga. L. 1984, p. 940, § 1.

42-2-10.
Office of board, commissioner, and staff.

The executive office of the board and the commissioner shall be located in the City of Atlanta, and suitable quarters shall be assigned to the board and the commissioner and to his staff of employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 27.

42-2-11.
Powers and duties of board; adoption of rules and regulations.

The board shall establish the general policy to be followed by the department and shall have the duties, powers, authority, and jurisdiction provided for in this title or as otherwise provided by law.

The board is authorized to adopt, establish, and promulgate rules and regulations governing the transaction of the business of the penal system of the state by the department and the commissioner and the administration of the affairs of the penal system in the different penal institutions coming under its authority and supervision and shall make the institutions as self-supporting as possible.

The board shall adopt rules governing the assignment, housing, working, feeding, clothing, treatment, discipline, rehabilitation, training, and hospitalization of all inmates coming under its custody.

As used in this paragraph, the term:

“Evidence based practices” means supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduce recidivism among individuals who are under some form of correctional supervision.

“Recidivism” means returning to prison or jail within three years of being placed on probation or being discharged or released from a department or jail facility.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the management and treatment of inmates coming under its custody to ensure that evidence based practices, including the use of a risk and needs assessment and any other method the board deems appropriate, guide decisions related to preparing inmates for release into the community. Any risk and needs assessment instrument shall be revalidated by January 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter. The board shall require the department to collect and analyze data and performance outcomes relevant to the level and type of treatment given to an inmate and the outcome of the treatment on his or her recidivism and prepare an annual report regarding such information which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Judiciary Committee.

Using evidence based practices, the board shall evaluate the quality of the programming utilized at all department facilities, except state prisons, by January 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter, and shall publicly publish its report.

The board shall also adopt rules and regulations governing the conduct and the welfare of the employees of the state institutions operating under its authority and of the county correctional institutions and correctional facilities or programs operating under its supervision. It shall prescribe the working hours and conditions of work for employees in the office of the commissioner and in institutions operating under the authority of the board.

The board shall also adopt rules and regulations governing the negotiation and execution of any contract for the land acquisition, design, construction, operation, maintenance, use, lease, or management of a state correctional institution or for any services pertaining to the custody, care, and control of inmates or other functions as are related to the discharge of these responsibilities.

The board shall adopt rules:

Providing for the transfer to a higher security facility of each inmate who commits battery or aggravated assault against a correctional officer while in custody; provided, however, that this provision shall not apply in instances where the inmate is already incarcerated in a maximum security facility; and

Specifying the procedures for offering department assistance to employees who are victims of battery or aggravated assault by inmates in filing criminal charges or civil actions against their assailants, including procedures for posting notices that such assistance is available to any employee who is subjected to battery or aggravated assault by an inmate, but not including legal representation of such employees.

All rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Code section shall be adopted, established, promulgated, amended, repealed, filed, and published in accordance with the applicable provisions and procedure as set forth in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The courts shall take judicial notice of any such rules or regulations.

As used in this Code section, the words “rules and regulations” shall have the same meaning as the word “rule” is defined in paragraph (6) of Code Section 50-13-2.

The board shall have the authority to request bids and proposals and to enter into contracts for the operation of probation detention centers by private companies and entities for the confinement of probationers under Code Section 42-8-35.4. The board shall have the authority to adopt, establish, and promulgate rules and regulations for the operation of probation detention centers by private companies and entities.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 11; Ga. L. 1969, p. 598, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1647, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, §§ 31, 60; Ga. L. 1983, p. 507, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 691, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 726, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 727, § 1/SB 44; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-4/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 42/HB 79; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-68/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-2/SB 367; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-2/SB 174.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, designated the existing provisions of subsection (c) as paragraph (c)(1) and added paragraph (c)(2). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Committee on State Properties” for “House Committee on State Institutions and Property” near the end of the last sentence of
subparagraph (c)(2)(B).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subparagraph (c)(2)(B), in the first sentence, substituted “inmates coming under its custody” for “inmates and probationers” near the middle, and deleted “and managing probationers in the community” at the end, and deleted “or probationer” following “an inmate” near the middle of the second sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (i), deleted “and probation diversion centers for the confinement of probationers under Code Section 42-8-35.5” following “Code Section 42-8-35.4” at the end of the first sentence and deleted “and probation diversion” preceding “centers” near the end of the second sentence.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subparagraph (c)(2)(B), inserted the second sentence and substituted “House Committee on Judiciary and the Senate Judiciary Committee” for “House Committee on State Properties and the Senate State Institutions and Property Committee” at the end of the last sentence; and added subparagraph (c)(2)(C).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, subsection (g) as enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 726, § 1, was redesignated as subsection (f) and subsections (f) and (g) as enacted by Ga. L. 1996, 691, § 2, were redesignated as subsections (g) and (h), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 507, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note, “Behind Closed Doors: An Empirical Inquiry Into the Nature of Prison Discipline in Georgia,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 919 (1974).

For review of 1996 department of corrections legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 253 (1996).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-2-12.
Reasonableness of rules and regulations.

All rules and regulations enacted by the board under the authority of this chapter must be reasonable.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 12.

42-2-13.
Grants to municipal corporations and counties for local jails and correctional institutions.

The commissioner may make grants of funds to municipal corporations and counties for establishing, constructing, and operating local jails and correctional institutions. Any such grant shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, state payments made pursuant to Code Section 42-5-51 and Code Section 42-5-53. The commissioner shall make such grants where the recipient, sum, and purpose have been specified by appropriation. From funds generally available for such grants, but when such funds are available without specification other than general purpose, the commissioner shall allocate such funds according to criteria established by the commissioner, including, but not limited to, overpopulation, innovativeness, efficiency, multigovernment involvement, and readiness.

Pursuant to Article VII, Section III, Paragraph III of the Constitution and as otherwise may be authorized, all grants similar to grants provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section made by the department before March 15, 1988, are ratified, confirmed, and approved.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 256, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 42.

42-2-14.
Power of Governor to declare state of emergency with regard to jail and prison overcrowding.

The Governor, upon certification by the commissioner of corrections and approval by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget that the population of the prison system of the State of Georgia has exceeded the capacity of the prison system for any period of 90 consecutive days, beginning at any time after December 31, 1988, may declare a state of emergency with regard to jail and prison overcrowding. Following the declaration of such emergency, the department may establish additional facilities for use by the department, such facilities to be either of a permanent type of construction or of a temporary or movable type as the department may find most advantageous to the particular needs, to the end that the inmates under its supervision may be so distributed throughout the state as to facilitate individualization of treatment designed to prepare them for lawful living in the community where they are most likely to reside after their release from a correctional facility. For this purpose, the department may purchase or lease sites and suitable lands and erect necessary buildings thereon or purchase or lease existing facilities, all within the limits of appropriations as approved by the General Assembly. With the approval of the Governor, provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 50, relating to the Department of Administrative Services, or provisions of Code Section 50-6-25 or Chapter 22 of Title 50, relating to control over acquisition of professional services, may be waived by the department to facilitate the rapid construction or procurement of facilities for inmates; provided, however, that the authority to waive provisions of Code Section 50-6-25 shall terminate as of July 1, 1991. During any year in which correctional facilities are constructed or procured under this Code section and any requirements are waived, the department shall furnish the Governor and the General Assembly with a detailed report specifying the facilities constructed or procured, the requirements waived, and the reasons therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 57, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 135, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 42/HB 942.

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “provisions, other than bonding requirements, of Chapter 3 of this title, known as the ‘Georgia Building Authority (Penal) Act,’ ” preceding “provisions of Chapter 5” in the fourth sentence of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 287 (1989).

42-2-15.
Employee benefit fund.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Employee” means a full-time or part-time employee of the department or an employee serving under contract with the department.

“Employee benefit fund” means an account containing the facility’s profits generated from vending services maintained by a local facility.

“Executive director of the facility” means the warden, superintendent, or such other head of a facility.

“Facility” means a prison, institution, detention center, or such other similar property under the jurisdiction or operation of the department.

“Vending services” means one or more vending machines in a location easily accessible by employees, which services may also be accessible by members of the general public, but which vending machines do not require a manager or attendant for the purpose of purchasing food or drink items. Vending services shall be for the provision of snack or food items or nonalcoholic beverages and shall not include any tobacco products or alcoholic beverages.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide an employee benefit as set forth in this Code section which benefit shall be of de minimis cost to the state and which shall in turn benefit the state through the retention of dedicated and experienced employees.

Any other provision of the law notwithstanding, a facility is authorized to purchase vending machines or enter into vending service agreements by contract, sublease, or license for the purpose of providing vending services to each facility under the jurisdiction of the department. Vending services shall be provided in any facility where the operation of such vending services is capable of generating a profit for that facility. The facility’s profits generated from the vending services shall be maintained by the local facility under the authority of the executive director of the facility in an interest-bearing account and the account shall be designated the “employee benefit fund.”

The fund shall be administered by a committee of five representatives of the facility to be selected by the executive director of the facility. Funds from the account may be spent as determined by a majority vote of the committee. Funds may be expended on an individual employee of the facility for the purpose of recognizing a death, birth, marriage, or prolonged illness or to provide assistance in the event of a natural disaster or devastation adversely affecting an employee or an employee’s immediate family member. Funds may also be expended on an item or activity which shall benefit all employees of the facility equally for the purposes of developing camaraderie or otherwise fostering loyalty to the department or bringing together the employees of the facility for a meeting, training session, or similar gathering. Funds spent for an individual employee shall not exceed $250.00 per person per event and funds expended for employee gatherings or items shall not exceed $1,000.00 per event or single item; provided, however, that events conducted for the benefit of employees of an entire institution shall not exceed $4,500.00 per event.

The employee benefit fund account of each facility shall be reviewed and audited by the administrative office of the local facility and by the department in accordance with standards and procedures established by the department. No account shall maintain funds in excess of $5,000.00. Any funds collected which cause the fund balance to exceed $5,000.00 shall be remitted to the department’s general operating budget.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a facility from purchasing vending machines or providing or maintaining vending services which do not generate a profit, provided that such services are of no cost to the department, nor shall this Code section be construed so as to prohibit a private provider of vending services from making or retaining a profit pursuant to any agreement for such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 332, § 1/HB 1318; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-69/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 8-3/SB 367.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “chief probation official,” following “superintendent,” in paragraph (a)(3); and deleted “probation office,” following “diversion center,” in paragraph (a)(4). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “diversion center,” following “detention center,” in paragraph (a)(4).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

42-2-16.
Retaining department issued weapons.

An employee leaving the service of the department under honorable conditions who has accumulated 20 or more years of service with the department as a certified officer shall be entitled as part of such employee’s compensation to retain his or her department issued weapon.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-2-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 82, § 1/HB 482.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2013.